Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.280

Repayment of contributions on death or termination of employment—Election to receive reduced retirement allowance at age fifty-five.

(1) If a member dies before retirement, and has no surviving spouse or domestic partner or children under the age of eighteen years, all contributions made by the member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), with interest as determined by the director, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to such person or persons as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department, or if there be no such designated person or persons, then to the member's legal representative.

(2) If a member should cease to be an employee before attaining age sixty for reasons other than the member's death, or retirement, the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member except as provided under RCW 43.43.130 (2), (3), and (4) and, the individual may withdraw the member's contributions to the retirement fund, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), with interest as determined by the director, by making application therefor to the department, except that: A member who ceases to be an employee after having completed at least five years of service shall remain a member during the period of the member's absence from employment for the exclusive purpose only of receiving a retirement allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty, however such a member may upon written notice to the department elect to receive a reduced retirement allowance on or after age fifty-five which allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular retirement benefits as of age sixty: PROVIDED, That if such member should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions, the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this subsection shall not apply.

[ 2009 c 522 s 6; 1994 c 197 s 35; 1991 c 365 s 32; 1987 c 215 s 2; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 29; 1973 1st ex.s. c 180 s 5; 1969 c 12 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.280. Prior: 1961 c 93 s 3; 1951 c 140 s 7; 1947 c 250 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6363-97.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Effective date—1987 c 215: See note following RCW 43.43.130.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.

Construction—1969 c 12: See note following RCW 43.43.120.